District of Columbia statutes.
48-315

Applicability.

(a)

Sections 48-311, 48-312, and 48-313 shall apply as of March 10, 2015.

(b)

Section 48-314 shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-191, § 6, 61 DCR 12160
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 17 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-76, Feb. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 264).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 8 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-164, Oct. 16, 2015, 62 DCR 13734).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 11 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-292, Jan. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 1211).